New York, session 2025-2026, A4632.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Encourage and promote farmers' markets which offer for sale farm 4 and food products, as such terms are defined in section two hundred 5 sixty of the agriculture and markets law, at state parks when such farm- 6 ers' market does not harm the natural environment or integrity of the 7 park. Such promotion shall include but not be limited to: 8 (a) posting information on the office's website pertaining to 9 locations and times of operation for such farmers' markets held in state 10 parks; 11 (b) identifying opportunities to expand farmers' markets to additional 12 state park locations; and 13 (c) coordinating with other state agencies, including but not limited 14 to empire state development and the department of agriculture and 15 markets, to further the goals of this subdivision. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03145-01-5